North Carolina statutes. Chapter 156. Drainage.
Part 2. Petition under Agreement for Construction.

§ 156-26.
Procedure upon agreement.

Agreement; Names Filed. — Whenever a majority of the landowners or the persons owning three fifths of all the lands in any well-defined swamp or lowlands shall, by a written agreement, agree to give a part of the land situated in such swamp or lowlands as compensation to any person, firm, or corporation who may propose to cut or dig any main drainway through such swamp or lowlands, or shall, by written agreement, contract with any person, firm or corporation to cut or dig any main drainway through such swamp or lowlands, then the person, firm, or corporation so proposing to cut or dig such main drainway shall file with the clerk of the superior court of the county, or, if there be two or more counties, with the clerk of the superior court of either county in or through which the proposed canal or drainway is to pass, the names of the landowners, with the approximate number of acres owned by each to be affected by the proposed drainway who have entered into the written agreement with the person, firm, or corporation, together with a brief outline of the proposed improvement, and in addition thereto shall file with the clerk the names and addresses, as far as can be ascertained, of the landowners, with the number of acres owned by each of them to be affected by the proposed drainway, who have not made any agreement with the person, firm, or corporation proposing to do the improvement.

Notice. — Upon the filing of such names, it shall be the duty of the clerk to forthwith issue a notice which shall be served by the sheriff to all landowners who have not made any agreement to appear before him at a certain date, which date shall be not less than 10 and not more than 20 days from the service of such notice, or, in lieu of the personal service hereinabove required, it shall be sufficient for the clerk to publish in a newspaper published in the county once a week for four weeks a notice to all landowners who have not made any agreement to appear before him at a certain date, which date shall be not less than 30 days and not more than 40 days from the first publication of notice, at which time and place the landowners shall state their objections to the proposed improvement, and in addition thereto make an estimate of the amount of damage that might be done to the land owned by each of them on account of the proposed drainway.

Hearing; Viewers. — Upon the hearing it shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court to forthwith appoint three disinterested persons, none of whom shall own land to be affected by such drainway, if requested by the person, firm, or corporation proposing to do the improvement, whose duty it shall be to familiarize themselves with the proposed improvement, view the premises of the landowners, estimating damages, and make an estimate themselves of the amount of damages that might accrue to the lands of each landowner filing objections on account of the proposed improvement, and report the same to the clerk of the superior court within 15 days from the date of their appointment.

Report; Bond. — Immediately upon the filing of the reports the clerk of the superior court shall forthwith notify the person, firm, or corporation proposing to dig the drainway or canal of the estimated damages contained in the reports, and the person, firm, or corporation shall execute and deliver a bond in a surety company authorized to do business in the State of North Carolina in twice the sum total of the estimated amount of damages, which bond shall be payable to the clerk of the superior court and conditioned upon the payment to the landowners of the amount of damages that may be assessed in the manner hereinafter provided.

Construction Authorized. — Upon the execution and delivery to the clerk of the said bond, the person, firm, or corporation so proposing to cut or dig such main drainway shall be and they are hereby authorized to proceed with the cutting or digging of the drainway through any lands in its proposed course, whether the owners of the land may have consented thereto or not, and the person, firm, or corporation so proposing to cut or dig the drainway shall have the proper and necessary right-of-way for that purpose and for all things incident thereto through any lands or timbers situated in such swamp or lowlands.

History.

1917, c. 273, s. 1; C.S., s. 5284; 1969, c. 1046.

§ 156-27.
Recovery for benefits; payment of damages.

After the drainway herein provided for shall be completed the person, firm, or corporation cutting or digging the same shall be entitled to recover of the landowners owning that part of the land with reference to which no contract for compensating those cutting or digging the drainway may have been made, an amount equal to the benefits to accrue to such lands by reason of the drainway, and shall be required by the clerk of the superior court to pay to any landowner the amount of damages in excess of benefits which may be done to the land to be determined in the manner hereinafter provided: Provided, that the recovery from any owner of the land shall be limited to the benefits to accrue to that land owned by such person, and situated in such swamp or lowlands or adjacent thereto; and provided further, that the amount to be so recovered as herein provided for until fully paid shall be and constitute a lien upon such land, the lien to be in force regardless of who may own the land at the time the amount to be recovered as compensation for digging or cutting the drainway shall be determined.

History.

1917, c. 273, s. 2; C.S., s. 5285.

§ 156-28.
Notice to landowners; assessments made by viewers.

After the completion of the main drainway, upon the application of the person, firm, or corporation, or their heirs or assigns, digging or cutting the same, the clerk of the superior court of the county in which any land through which the drainway may pass is situated shall issue a notice to be served by the sheriff upon any person who may have failed to agree with the person, firm, or corporation digging or cutting such drainway, upon a compensation to be paid by the landowner for the digging or cutting of such drainway, notifying the landowner that on a certain day, which shall be named in the notice and not less than 20 days from the date of the issuing of the notice, the clerk of the superior court will appoint three competent and disinterested persons, one of whom may be a surveyor, and none of whom shall own land to be affected by the drainway, to view the land so drained and for which no compensation for the drainage may have been agreed upon as aforesaid, and report to the clerk of the superior court what amount shall be paid therefor by the various landowners who may have failed to arrange for and agree upon the compensation for the drainage as aforesaid, and the amount of damages in cases where the damages have exceeded the benefits, which shall be paid to the landowners by the person, firm, or corporation cutting or digging such canal or drainway. In making the appointment of the viewers the clerk of the superior court shall hear any objections which may be advanced by those interested to any of the persons the clerk may consider to be appointed as viewers, but the clerk shall name those whom he considers best qualified.

History.

1917, c. 273, s. 3; C.S., s. 5286.

§ 156-29.
Report filed; appeal and jury trial.

A report signed by two of the persons appointed as viewers shall be entered by the clerk as the report of the viewers. Any landowner affected by the report, and the person, firm, or corporation digging or cutting the drainway, has the right of appeal and the right to have any issue arising upon the report tried by a jury, provided exceptions shall be filed to the report within 20 days after the filing of the report with the clerk, in which exceptions so filed may be a demand for a jury trial. If a jury trial is demanded, the clerk shall transfer the proceedings to the civil-issue docket, and it shall be heard as other civil actions. If no jury trial is demanded, the clerk shall hear the parties upon the exceptions filed, and appeal may be had as in special proceedings except as modified by this section, but no jury trial may be had unless demanded as provided in this section.

History.

1917, c. 273, s. 4; C.S., s. 5287; 1999-216, s. 17.

Cross References.

As to appeal in special proceedings, see

G.S. 1-301.1

et seq.

§ 156-30.
Confirmation of report.

Unless an appeal is taken, the clerk of superior court shall confirm the report of the viewers. If exceptions are filed and no jury trial is demanded, the clerk shall hear the exceptions and enter judgment as in other special proceedings. If the report is confirmed by the clerk because no exceptions or demand for a jury trial is filed, the judgment of confirmation is the judgment of the court. Any judgment entered against the person, firm, or corporation cutting or digging the drainway is a judgment against the person, firm, or corporation and against the surety on the bond required by

G.S. 156-26

.

History.

1917, c. 273, s. 5; C.S., s. 5288; 1999-216, s. 18.

§ 156-31.
Payment in installments.

The amount to be recovered from any person as compensation for digging or cutting the drainway after the amount shall be definitely determined as herein provided for, shall be payable in five equal annual installments, the first payable one year from the filing of the report of the viewers with the clerk of the superior court, and one payment on the same day of each year thereafter until the full amount be paid. The amount to be recovered from the person, firm, or corporation cutting or digging the drainway, on account of any damages in excess of benefits to the lands of any landowner, shall be payable in one installment which shall be due and payable one year from the filing of the report of the viewers with the clerk of the superior court.

History.

1917, c. 273, s. 6; C. S., s. 5289.